Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.090

Denial, suspension, revocation of license—Hearings subject to Administrative Procedure Act.

All hearings for a denial, suspension, or revocation of the license provided for in RCW 15.30.020 shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW concerning adjudicative proceedings.

[ 1989 c 175 s 45; 1961 c 29 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.